Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.165

Regional committees—Organization, meetings, quorum.

Each regional committee shall organize by electing from its membership a chair and a vice chair. The educational service district superintendent shall be the secretary of the committee. Meetings of the committee shall be held upon call of the chair or of a majority of the members thereof. A majority of the committee shall constitute a quorum.

[ 1990 c 33 s 297; 1985 c 385 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 82; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 119; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.040. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-31; prior: 1941 c 248 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4709-4. Formerly RCW 28A.315.100, 28A.57.040, 28.57.040.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.